da: Mønster: Abstrakt; Dyr; Kunst; Perle og hjul; Fugle; Mursten; Bull's eye; Camouflage; Karakterer; Ternet; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Jul; Collage; Koral; Damask; Diagonal; Diamant; Hundetand; Prikker; Æg og dart; Etnisk; Evig knude; Blomster; Fret; Geometrisk; Guilloche; Hjerter; Illusion; Blonde; Blade; Logo; Mosaik; Ogee; Økologisk; Paisley; Plaid; Regnbue; Tilfældig; Skala; Rulle; Solid; Stjerner; Stribet; Hvirvel; Tekst; Struktur; Tie-dye; Trellis; Køretøj; Andet
fr: Motif: Abstrait; Animal; Art; Perle et bobine; Oiseaux; Brique; Œil de bœuf; Camouflage; Personnages; Damier; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Noël; Collage; Corail; Damassé; Diagonal; Diamant; Dent de chien; Points; Œuf et fléchette; Ethnique; Nœud éternel; Floral; Frette; Géométriques; Guilloche; Cœurs; Illusion; Dentelle; Feuilles; Logo; Mosaïque; Doucine; Bio; Cachemire; Plaid; Arc-en-ciel; Aléatoire; Échelle; Rouleau; Solide; Étoiles; Rayé; Tourbillon; Texte; Texture; Teinture par nœuds; Treillis; Véhicule; Autre
hu: Minta: Absztrakt; Állat; Művészet; Gyöngy és orsó; Madár; Tégla; Bikaszem; Terepszínű; Karakterek; Kockás; Ék alakú; Chinoiserie; Karácsonyi; Kollázs; Korall; Damaszkuszi; Átlós; Gyémánt; Tyúkláb; Pontok; Egg & dart; Etnikai; Örök kötelék; Virágok; Görög; Geometriai; Guilloche; Szívek; Illúzió; Csipke; Levelek; Logó; Mozaik; Ogee; Organikus; Paisley; Kockás; Szivárvány; Véletlenszerű; Pikkely; Csigavonal; Egyszínű; Csillagok; Csíkos; Örvény; Szöveg; Struktúra; Batikolt; Rácsos; Autós; Egyéb
vi: Mẫu: Trừu tượng; Động vật; Nghệ thuật; Hạt & cuộn; Chim; Gạch; Mắt bò; Ngụy trang; Nhân vật; Ca-rô; Gờ trang trí zic zắc; Đồ Trung Hoa; Giáng sinh; Nghệ thuật cắt dán ảnh; San hô; Damask; Đường chéo; Kim cương; Răng chó; Chấm; Trứng và đầu mũi tên; Dân tộc; Nút đồng tâm; Hoa cỏ; Băn khoăn; Hình học; Guilloche; Trái tim; Ảo giác; Ren; Lá; Logo; Khảm; Đường xoi; Hữu cơ; Paisley; Kẻ sọc; Cầu vồng; Ngẫu nhiên; Tỉ lệ; Cuộn; Lốp rắn; Ngôi sao; Kẻ sọc; Xoáy; Văn bản; Có vân; Nhuộm buộc; Lưới mắt cáo; Xe cộ; Khác
el: Μοτίβο: Αφηρημένο; Ζώο; Τέχνη; Αστράγαλος; Πουλιά; Τούβλο; Στόχος; Καμουφλάζ; Χαρακτήρες; Καρό; Σιρίτι; Κινέζικο; Χριστούγεννα; Κολάζ; Κοράλλι; Δαμάσκο; Διαγώνιος; Διαμάντι; Δόντι σκύλου; Πουά; Egg & dart; Ethnic; Αιώνιος κόμπος; Φλοράλ; Τάστο; Γεωμετρικό; Σύμπλεκτες γραμμές; Καρδιές; Ψευδαίσθηση; Δαντέλα; Φύλλα; Λογότυπο; Μωσαϊκό; Αψίδα; Βιολογική; Λαχούρι; Καρό; Ουράνιο τόξο; Τυχαίο; Κλίμακα; Πάπυρος; Στερεάς μορφής; Αστέρια; Ριγέ; Δίνη; Κείμενο; Υφή; Tie-dye; Καφασωτό; Οχημα; Άλλο
ru: Рисунок: Абстрактный; Животное; Искусство; Орнамент из шариков и роликов; Птицы; Кирпич; Круги; Камуфляж; Персонажи; Клетка; Шевроны; Шинуазри; Рождество; Коллаж; Коралл; Дамаск; Диагональ; Ромбы; Собачий зуб; Точки; Ионика; Этнический; Вечный узел; Цветы; Меандр; Геометрический; Гильош; Сердца; Иллюзия; Ажурный; Листья; Логотип; Мозаика; Оджи; Органический; Пейсли; Клетчатый; Радуга; Случайный; Чешуя; Завитки; Сплошной; Звезды; Полоска; Вихрь; Текст; Текстура; Тай-дай; Треллис; Машины; Другой
ja: パターン: 抽象的; 動物; アート; ビーズ/リール; 鳥; レンガ; ブルズアイ; カモフラージュ; キャラクター; チェック柄; シェブロン; シノワズリ; クリスマス; コラージュ; コーラル; ダマスク; 対角; ダイヤモンド; ドッグトゥース; ドット; エッグ&ダーツ; エスニック; エンドレスノット; フローラル; フレット; ジオメトリック; ギョーシェ; ハート; イリュージョン; レース; 葉; ロゴ; モザイク; オジー; オーガニック; ペイズリー; プレード; レインボー; ランダム; スケール; スクロール; ソリッド; 星; ストライプ; 渦巻き; テキスト; 質感; タイダイ; トレリス; 車; その他
th: ลวดลาย: นามธรรม; สัตว์; ศิลปะ; Bead & reel; นก; อิฐ; จุดกลางเป้า; ลายพราง; ลายตัวละคร; ลายหมากรุก; บั้ง; ลวดลายจีน; คริสต์มาส; คอลลาจ; Coral; ดามาส; เส้นทแยงมุม; เพชร; Dog's tooth; ลายจุด; Egg & dart; ชาติพันธุ์; Everlasting knot; ลายดอก; Fret; ลายเรขาคณิต; Guilloche; หัวใจ; Illusion; ลูกไม้; ลายใบไม้; โลโก้; โมเสก; Ogee; ออร์แกนิก; ลายเพสลีย์; ลายสก๊อต; รุ้ง; สุ่ม; Scale; Scroll; โซลิด; หมู่ดาว; ลายริ้ว; Swirl; ข้อความ; พื้นผิว; ลายมัดย้อม; Trellis; ยานพาหนะ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 图案: 抽象; 动物; 艺术; 半圆饰/珠链饰; 鸟类; 砖; 靶心; 迷彩; 人物; 方格子; V 形线条; 中国风; 圣诞节; 拼贴画; 珊瑚; 锦缎; 对角线; 钻石; 犬牙; 点; 卵锚饰; 种族的; 盘长结; 花型; 回纹饰; 几何图形; 扭索饰; 心形; 错觉; 蕾丝; 叶子; logo; 马赛克; 弯曲 S 角; 有机; 佩兹利涡旋纹; 格子; 彩虹; 随机; 鳞纹; 卷草纹; 坚固; 星星; 带条纹; 漩涡纹; 文字; 质地; 扎染; 镂空格纹; 车辆; 其他
pl: Wzorzec: Abstrakt; Zwierzęcy; Sztuka; Koralik/rolka; Ptaki; Cegła; Strzał w dziesiątkę; Kamuflaż; Postacie; Kratka; Szewron; Chinoiserie; Boże Narodzenie; Kolaż; Koralowy; Adamaszek; Przekątna; Diament; Ząb psa; Kropki; Jajko i strzałka; Etniczny; Wieczny węzeł; Kwiatowy; Ornament geometryczny; Geometryczny; Guilloche; Kierki; Iluzja; Koronka; Liście; Logo; Mozaika; Ośli grzbiet; Organiczna; Paisley; Tartan; Tęcza; Losowy; Skala; Woluta; Stały; Gwiazdy; Pasiasty; Zawijas; Tekst; Tekstura; Batikowy; Krata; Pojazd; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Padrão: Abstrato; Animal; Arte; Conta e carretel; Pássaros; Tijolo; Alvo; Camuflar; Personagens; Xadrez; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Natal; Colagens; Coral; Mosaico; Diagonal; Diamante; Dente de cachorro; Pontos; Ovo e dardo; Étnico; Nó eterno; Floral; Arabesco; Geométrico; Guilhoché; Corações; Ilusão; Renda; Folhas; Logotipo; Mosaico; Em forma de S; Orgânico; Caxemira; Xadrez; Arco-íris; Aleatório; Escala; Deslizante; Maciço; Estrelas; Faixa; Redemoinho; Texto; Textura; Atar e tingir; Treliça; Veículo; Outro
sv: Mönster: Abstrakt; Djur; Konst; Pärlband; Fåglar; Tegel; Bull's eye; Kamouflage; Tecken; Målflaggor; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Jul; Collage; Korall; Damast; Diagonal; Diamant; Dog's tooth; Prickar; Egg & dart; Etnisk; Everlasting knot; Blommig; Fret; Geometrisk; Guilloche; Hjärtan; Illusion; Spets; Löv; Logotyp; Mosaik; Ogee; Organisk; Paisley; Plaid; Rainbow; Random; Scale; Scroll; Solid; Stjärnor; Randig; Swirl; Text; Textur; Tie-dye; Trellis; Fordon; Annat
tr: Model: Soyut; Hayvan; Sanat; Boncuk ve makara; Kuşlar; Tuğla; Bullseye; Kamuflaj; Karakterler; Damalı; Şerit; Çin tarzı; Noel; Kolaj; Mercan; Şam; Diyagonal; Elmas; Köpek dişi; Noktalar; Yumurta ve dart; Etnik; Sonsuz düğüm; Çiçek; fret; Geometrik; Guillochlu; Kalp; İllüzyon; Dantel; Yapraklar; Logo; Mozaik; Deveboynu; Organik; Şal deseni; Ekose; Gökkuşağı; Rastgele; Ölçek; Yuvarlama; Düz; Yıldızlar; Çizgili; Girdap; Metin; Doku; Batik; Çardak; Araçlar; Diğer
bg-BG: Модел: Абстрактен; Животно; Изкуство; Мъниста и макара; Птици; Тухла; Око на бик; Камуфлаж; Символи; Кариран; Шеврон; Шиноазери; Коледa; Колаж; Корал; Дамаска; Диагонал; Диамант; Зъб на куче; Точки; Яйце и стрела; Етнически; Вечен възел; Флорален; Правоъгълен орнамент; Геометричен; Гильош; Сърца; Илюзия; Дантела; Листа; Лого; Мозайка; Оги; Органичен; Пейсли; Каре; Дъга; Случаен; Скала; Превъртане; Твърдо вещество; Звезди; На райета; Вихър; Текст; Текстура; Тай-дай; Решетка; Превозно средство; Други
ro-RO: Model: Abstract; Animal; Artă; Mulură convexă semi-rotundă decorată cu mărgele; Păsări; Cărămidă; Țintă; Camuflaj; Personaje; În carouri; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Crăciun; Colaj; Coral; Damasc; Diagonal; Romboidal; Picior de cocoș; Puncte; Ove; Etnic; Nod infinit; Floral; Grecesc; Geometric; Guilloche; Inimi; Iluzie; Dantelă; Frunze; Logo; Mozaic; Ogivă; Organic; Paisley; Carouri; Curcubeu; Aleatoriu; Scară; Spirale și curbe; Uni; Stele; În dungi; Vârtej; Text; Textură; Tie-dye; Trellis; Vehicul; Altele
sk-SK: Vzor: Abstraktný; Zviera; Umenie; Perlovec s okrúhlymi a šošovkovitými prvkami; Vtáky; Tehla; Terčový; Kamufláž; Postavy; Kockovaný; Ševrón; Chinoiserie; Vianočný; Kolážový; Koralový; Damaskový; Uhlopriečny; Diamantový; Pepito; Bodkovaný; Vajcovec; Etno; Srivatsa; Kvetinový; Fret; Geometrický; Giloš; Srdiečka; Optický klam; Čipka; Listy; Logo; Mozaika; Esovitý; Organický; Paisley; Kockovaný pléd; Dúhový; Fraktálny; Šupinový; Volútový; Priestorový; Hviezdny; Pruhovaný; Krúživý; Textový; Textúrový; Batikovaný; Trellis; Vozidlový; Iné
zh-TW: 圖案: 抽象; 動物; 藝術; 珠和捲; 鳥類; 磚; 靶心; 迷彩; 人物; 方格; V 形圖案; 中式風格; 聖誕節; 拼貼畫; 珊瑚紅; 錦緞; 對角線; 鑽石; 狗的牙齒; 點; 蛋和飛鏢; 種族; 盤長結; 花卉; 品; 幾何的; 扭索飾紋; 心型; 錯覺; 蕾絲; 葉子; 標誌; 馬賽克; S 形曲線; 有機; 變形蟲; 格紋; 彩虹; 隨機; 規模; 捲軸; 實心; 星星; 有條紋的; 漩渦; 文字; 質地; 紮染; 格子; 車輛; 其他
it: Fantasia: Astratto; Animale; Arte; Perlina e bobina; Uccelli; Mattone; Occhio di bue; Militare; Caratteri; Scacchi; Motivo a zigzag; Chinoiserie; Natalizia; Collage; Corallo; Damasco; Diagonale; Diamante; Dente di cane; Pois; Uovo e dardo; Etnico; Nodo eterno; Floreale; Non preoccuparti; Geometrica; Guilloche; Cuori; Illusione; Pizzo; Foglie; Logo; Mosaico; Ogivale; Biologico; Paisley; Plaid; Arcobaleno; Casuale; Scala; A spirale; Tinta unica; Stelle; Righe; Vortice; Testo; Tramato; Tie dye; Trellis; Veicolo; Altro
fi: Kuvio: Abstrakti; Eläin; Taide; Helmi/rulla; Linnut; Tiili; Härän silmä; Naamiointi; Hahmot; Ruudullinen; Sahanteräkoriste; Kineseria; Joulu; Kollaasi; Koralli; Damaski; Diagonaalinen; Timantti; Koiran hammas; Pisteet; Muna ja tikka; Etninen; Ikuinen solmu; Kukikas; Koristekuvio; Geometrinen; Guilloche; Sydämet; Illuusio; Pitsi; Lehdet; Logo; Mosaiikki; Ogee; Luomu; Paisley; Ruudullinen; Sateenkaari; Satunnainen; Mittakaava; Kierukka; Kiinteä; Tähdet; Raidallinen; Pyörre; Teksti; Tekstuuri; Solmioväri; Ristikko; Ajoneuvo; Muu
es: Patrón: Abstracto; Animal; Arte; Cuentas y carrete; Aves; Ladrillo; Ojo de buey; Camuflaje; Personajes; A cuadros; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Navidad; Collage; Coral; Damasco; Diagonal; Diamante; Diente de perro; Lunares; Ovas y flechas; Étnico; Nudo infinito; Floral; Friso griego; Geométrico; Guilloché; Corazones; Espejismo; Encaje; Hojas; Logo; Mosaico; Ojival; Orgánico; Cachemir; A cuadros; Arcoíris; Aleatorio; Escala; Pergamino; Sólido; Estrellas; A rayas; Remolino; Texto; Textura; Teñido anudado; Enrejado; Vehículo; Otros
en: Pattern: Abstract; Animal; Art; Bead & reel; Birds; Brick; Bull's eye; Camouflage; Characters; Checkered; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Christmas; Collage; Coral; Damask; Diagonal; Diamond; Dog's tooth; Dots; Egg & dart; Ethnic; Everlasting knot; Floral; Fret; Geometric; Guilloche; Hearts; Illusion; Lace; Leaves; Logo; Mosaic; Ogee; Organic; Paisley; Plaid; Rainbow; Random; Scale; Scroll; Solid; Stars; Striped; Swirl; Text; Texture; Tie-dye; Trellis; Vehicle; Other
cs: Vzor: Abstraktní; Zvíře; Umění; Korálky/cívka; Ptáci; Cihla; Býčí oko; Maskovací; Postavy; Kostkovaný; Stříšky; Chinoiserie; Vánoce; Koláž; Korálová; Damašek; Diagonální; Diamant; Psí zub; Tečky; Vejcovec; Etnický; Věčný uzel; Květinový; Fret; Geometrický; Gilošovaný; Srdce; Iluze; Krajková; Listy; Logo; Mozaika; Esovitý; Organické; Kašmírový vzor; Přehoz; Duha; Náhodný; Škála; Svitek; Pevná; Hvězdy; Pruhovaný; Vír; Text; Textura; Batikovaný; Trellis; Vozidlo; Jiné
ko: 패턴: 추상; 동물; 미술; 비드/릴; 새; 벽돌; 불스아이; 위장; 캐릭터; 체크무늬; 쉐브론; 시누아즈리; 크리스마스; 콜라주; 산호; 다마스크; 대각선; 다이아몬드; 개 이빨; 도트; 계란 및 다트; 민족; 영원한 매듭; 꽃; 프렛; 기하학; Guilloche; 하트; 환각; 레이스; 나뭇잎; 로고; 모자이크; 반곡선; 유기농; 페이즐리; 격자 무늬; 무지개; 무작위; 규모; 스크롤; 솔리드; 별; 줄무늬; 소용돌이; 텍스트; 질감(식감); 홀치기 염색; 격자; 자동차; 기타
pt-PT: Padrão: Abstrato; Animal; Arte; Conta e Carretel; Pássaros; Tijolo; Olho de boi; Camuflagem; Personagens; Axadrezado; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Natal; Colagem; Coral; Damasco; Diagonal; Diamante; Dente de cão; Pontos; Ovo e dardo; Étnico; Nó eterno; Floral; Preocupação; Geométrico; Guilloche; Corações; Ilusão; Rendilhado; Folhas; Logótipo; Mosaico; Ogival; Orgânico; Cornucópias; Xadrez; Arco-íris; Aleatório; Escala; Rolagem; Sólido; Estrelas; Às riscas; Redemoinho; Texto; Textura; Tingido; Trellis; Veículo; Outro
nl: Patroon: Abstract; Dier; Kunst; Kraal en spoel; Vogels; Baksteen; In de roos; Camouflage; Figuren; Geruit; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Kerst; Collage; Koraal; Damast; Diagonal; Diamant; Hondentand; Punten; Ei en pijl; Etnisch; Oneindige knoop; Gebloemd; Tobben; Geometrisch; Guilloche; Harten; Illusie; Kant; Bladeren; Logo; Mozaïek; Ogief; Biologisch; Paisley; Plaid; Regenboog; Willekeurig; Schaal; Rol; Stevig; Sterren; Gestreept; Wervel; Tekst; Textuur; Knoopverven; Trellis; Voertuig; Andere
hr-HR: Uzorak: Apstraktni; Životinjski; Umjetnost; Perla i kolut; Ptice; Cigla; Meta; Kamuflažni; Likovi; Karirani; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Božić; Kolaž; Koralj; Damast; Dijagonalni; Dijamant; Pasji zub; Točkice; Jaje i strelica; Etno; Beskrajni čvor; Cvjetni; Fret; Geometrijski; Gijoširani; Srca; Iluzija; Čipka; Lišće; Logotip; Mozaik; Ogee; Organski; Paisley; Tartan; Duga; Nasumični; Ljestvica; Svitak; Jednobojni; Zvijezde; Pruge; Vrtlog; Tekst; Tekstura; Tie-dye; Rešetka; Vozilo; Ostalo
de: Muster: Abstrakt; Tier; Kunst; Perle und Rolle; Vögel; Ziegel; Bullauge; Tarnmuster; Figuren; Kariert; Winkel; Chinoiserie; Weihnachten; Collage; Koralle; Damast; Diagonal; Diamant; Hahnentritt; Punkte; Samenkapsel; Ethnisch; Ewiger Knoten; Blumenmuster; Bund; Geometrisch; Guilloche; Herzen; Illusion; Spitze; Blätter; Logo; Mosaik; Kielbogen; Bio; Paisley; Plaid; Regenbogen; Zufällig; Skala; Scroll; Solide; Sterne; Gestreift; Strudel; Text; Textur; Schnurbatik; Gitter; Fahrzeug; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vzorec: Abstraktno; Žival; Umetnost; Ploščate in okrogle kroglice; Ptice; Opeka; Koncentrični krogi; Kamuflaža; Liki; Šahovnica; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Božičen; Kolaž; Korale; Damask; Diagonalen; Diamant; Houndstooth; Pike; Jajca in puščice; Etničen; Večni vozel; Cvetličen; Grški; Geometrijski; Giljoša; Srca; Iluzija; Čipka; Listi; Logotip; Mozaik; Ogee; Organski; Paisley; Karo; Mavrica; Naključno; Luske; Spirale; Enobarven; Zvezde; Črte; Vrtinec; Besedilo; Teksturiran; Z vozlanjem barvan; Rešetka; Vozilo; Drugo
lt-LT: Raštas: Abstraktus; Gyvūnų; Menas; Karoliukai ir ritės; Paukščiai; Plytos; Taikinys; Kamufliažas; Veikėjai; Langeliai; Ševronas; Chinoiserie; Kalėdos; Koliažas; Koralai; Damaskas; Įstrižas raštas; Deimantai; Šuns dantys; Taškeliai; Ovalūs ornamentai; Etniniai raštai; Begalinis mazgas; Gėlės; Stačiakampis ornamentas; Geometrinės figūros; Giljošas; Širdelės; Iliuzija; Nėriniai; Lapai; Logotipas; Mozaika; S kreivės; Organiškas raštas; Peislio raštas; Languotas; Vaivorykštė; Atsitiktinis; Žvyneliai; Raityti raštai; Vienspalvis; Žvaigždės; Dryžiai; Sūkuriai; Tekstas; Tekstūra; „Tie-dye“ raštas; Pinučiai; Transporto priemonė; Kita
nb: Mønster: Abstrakt; Dyr; Kunst; Perle og snelle; Fugler; Murstein; Midt i blinken; Kamuflere; Tegn; Rutete; Chevron; Chinoiserie; Jul; Kollasje; Korall; Damask; Diagonal; Diamant; Dog’s tooth; Prikker; Egg og dart; Etnisk; Evig knute; Blomster; Fret; Geometrisk; Guilloche; Hjerter; Illusjon; Blonde; Blader; Logo; Mosaikk; Ogee; Økologisk; Paisley; Tartan; Regnbue; Random; Skala; Rull; Fast; Stjerner; Stripete; Swirl; Tekst; Tekstur; Tie-dye; Trellis; Kjøretøy; Annen